Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2023.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) Interference with an election official is intimidating,
threatening, coercing or attempting to intimidate, threaten or coerce an
election official, whether verbally, in writing or through physical acts, with
the intent to:
(1) Impede or otherwise interfere with the performance by such
election official of their official duties; or
(2) retaliate against such election official in response to such official's
performance of their official duties.
(b) Interference with an election official is a severity level 7,
nonperson felony.
(c) This section shall not apply to any enforcement action taken by an
election official against an election judge or other election official as a
result of a violation of state or federal law or any rules and regulations
adopted pursuant thereto when such enforcement action is permitted by
state or federal law.
(d) (1) As used in this section, "election official" means a county
clerk, election commissioner, election judge, election clerk, member of a
canvassing, audit or any other election board or any other person engaged
in the performance of official election duties.
(2) "Election official" does not include poll agents.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.